Utah statutes.
58-24b-403.   Administration of a prescription drug.

(1)  A licensed physical therapist may purchase, store, and administer topical and aerosol medications that require a prescription only as provided in this section.

(2)  A licensed physical therapist may purchase, store, and administer:

(a)  topically applied medicinal agents, including steroids and analgesics, for wound care and for musculoskeletal treatment, using iontophoresis or phonorphoresis; and

(b)  aerosols for pulmonary hygiene in an institutional setting, if a licensed respiratory therapist is not available in, or within a 10 mile radius of, the institution.

(3)  A licensed physical therapist may only purchase, store, or administer a medication described in this section pursuant to a written prescription issued by a practitioner who is licensed to prescribe that medication.

(4)  This section does not authorize a licensed physical therapist to dispense a prescription drug.

